Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-240.17
Permitted improvements and growing crops of lessee; appraisers; assess value; report; file with county judge.

After the inspection, view and hearing provided for in section 72-240.16 the appraisers shall assess the value to the land of the permitted improvements and growing crops as of the date of expiration of the lease on the land and shall make and file a report of such value in writing with the county judge and shall include in such report a list of the value to the land for each permitted improvement individually. Such report shall be filed with the county judge within ten days from the date of the hearing held by the appraisers.

Laws 1967, c. 467, § 8, p. 1454;

Laws 1971, LB 413, § 8.